Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 65.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-165
Derivative action.

(ULLCA 902) A member may maintain a derivative
action to enforce a right of a limited liability company if:

(1) the member first
makes a demand on the other members in a member-managed limited liability
company, or the managers of a manager-managed limited liability company, requesting
that they cause the company to bring an action to enforce the right, and the
managers or other members do not bring the action within a reasonable time;
or

(2)
a demand under subdivision (1) of this section would be futile.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 65.